Texas, session 892, HB315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Section 62.051, Labor Code, is amended to read as follows: Sec. 62.051.  MINIMUM WAGE. Except as provided by Section 62.057, an employer shall pay to each employee not less than the greater of: (1)  $15 an hour; or (2)  the federal minimum wage under Section 6, Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Section 206). SECTION 2.  Section 62.151, Labor Code, is repealed. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect September 1, 2025.